Rhode Island statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 16 Safe Access to Public Roads

24-16-1.
Legislative findings.

It is hereby found and declared as follows:

To achieve a cleaner, greener transportation system the transportation plans of Rhode Island should consider the needs of all users of our roadways including pedestrians, bicyclists, public transportation riders, motorists and citizens of all ages and abilities, including children, the elderly and the disabled. By encouraging good planning, more citizens will achieve the health benefits associated with active forms of transportation while traffic congestion and automobile related air pollution will be reduced. Therefore, it shall be the policy of the state to consider people of all ages and abilities and all appropriate forms of transportation when planning roadway projects.

For all state and local transportation projects that are eligible for both federal and state funding and are subject to department of transportation oversight, Rhode Island must provide for the consideration of safe travel by all users of the road network, including motorists, pedestrians, bicyclists, and public transportation users, regardless of age or ability, through the use of complete street design features for safe travel in the planning, design, and construction of new or reconstructed facilities, but not including, resurfacing, or other maintenance — level projects.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 355, § 1.

24-16-2.
Complete street design.

When the state of Rhode Island constructs or modifies roads and highways, the relevant department must consider complete street design features that facilitate safe travel by all users that expands upon currently accepted state and federal design requirements to accommodate all users, including current and projected users, particularly pedestrians, bicyclists and individuals of all ages and mobility capabilities. These features of complete street design shall include, but not be limited to, sidewalks, paved shoulders suitable for use by bicyclists, lane striping, bicycle lanes, share the road signage, “road diets,” roundabouts, crosswalks, pedestrian control signalization, bus pull outs, curb cuts, raised crosswalks and ramps and traffic calming measures.

Exceptions to subsection (a) of this section shall be permissible only after the agency with jurisdiction over the project, fully demonstrates with supporting documentation which shall be available to the public, that one of the following exists:

Use by bicyclists and pedestrians is prohibited by law, such as within interstate highway corridors; or

The cost would be disproportionate to the need as determined by factors including, but not limited to, the following: (i) Land use context; (ii) Current and projected traffic volumes including non-motorized traffic; and (iii) population density; or

Demonstrated lack of need as determined by factors, including, but not limited to: (i) Land use; (ii) Current and projected traffic volumes including non-motorized traffic; and (iii) population density.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 355, § 1.

24-16-3.
Reports.

No later than two (2) years after the effective date of this chapter, the department of transportation shall publish a report showing how the department of transportation has complied with this section of highway law and changed their procedures to institutionalize complete streets design features into planning, project scoping, design and implementation of highway and road projects. The report shall include, but not be limited to, a discussion of the review of and revisions to various guidance documents regarding lane width, design speed, average daily traffic thresholds, level of service and roadway classification. The report shall also show any best practices that the transportation agency utilized in complying with §

24-16-2

of the highway law.

In establishing such best practices, consideration shall be given to the procedures for identifying the needs of the mix of users, including primary and secondary users and the identification of barriers, and summary of the documentation required by subsection

24-16-2(b)

of the highway law regarding why the transportation agency could not comply with subsection (a).

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 355, § 1.

24-16-4.
Department of transportation consultation.

In the project development process the department of transportation shall consult with transportation, land-use and environmental officials, including representatives from:

Cities and towns;

Metropolitan planning organizations;

Public transit operators;

Relevant state agencies; and

Other relevant stakeholders, including, but not limited to, representatives from disability rights groups, aging groups, bicycle and pedestrian advocates, and developers.

History of Section.

P.L. 2012, ch. 315, § 1; P.L. 2012, ch. 355, § 1.